Utah statutes.
63H-2-503.   Audits.

(1)  The state auditor may audit or contract with an independent certified public accountant to audit the books and accounts of the authority, including compliance with this chapter.

(2)  The authority shall reimburse the state auditor from the authority's available money for the actual and necessary costs of an audit conducted under Subsection (1).

